Utah statutes.
54-5-3.   Default in payment of fee -- Procedure to collect -- Penalties.

(1)  If the public utility fee is due and the payment is in default, a lien in the amount of the fee may be filed against the property of the utility and may be foreclosed in an action brought by the executive director of the Department of Commerce in the district court of any county in which property of the delinquent utility is located.

(2) (a)  If the fee computed and imposed under this chapter is not paid  within 60 days after it becomes due, the rights and privileges of the delinquent utility shall be suspended.

(b)  The executive director of the Department of Commerce shall transmit the name of the utility to the Public Service Commission, which may immediately enter an order suspending the operating rights of the utility.



Amended by Chapter 214, 1993 General Session

